Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.370

Waiver or delay of collection of tap-in charges, connection or hookup fees for low income persons.

Whenever a county waives or delays collection of tap-in charges, connection fees or hookup fees for low income persons, or class of low income persons, to connect to a system of sewerage or a system of water, the waiver or delay shall be pursuant to a program established by ordinance.

[ 1980 c 150 s 2.]